Indiana, session 2026, HB1194.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-33-8-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.41-2018,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) Murder is not bailable if the state
proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the proof is evident or
the presumption strong.
(b) Offenses other than murder are not bailable if the state
proves at a hearing under section 3.7 of this chapter:
(1) by a preponderance of the evidence that the proof is
evident or the presumption strong for the charged offense;
and
(2) by clear and convincing evidence that:
(A) the arrestee poses a substantial risk to the safety of any
other person or the community; and
(B) no conditions of release will reasonably protect the
safety of any other person or the community.
(c) In all other cases, offenses are bailable as provided in this
chapter.
2026 IN 1194—LS 6807/DI 106


SECTION 2. IC 35-33-8-3.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.7. (a) This section does not apply to a
charge of murder. A person charged with murder shall be detained
as provided in section 2 of this chapter.
(b) For a charge other than murder, on motion of the state at or
before an initial hearing, the court shall hold a hearing to
determine whether an arrestee shall be denied bail. The state may
request detention of the arrestee at a later date if it files a verified
petition alleging the existence of new information that was
unknown or unavailable at the time of the initial hearing.
(c) The court shall hold the bail hearing described in subsection
(b) not later than forty-eight (48) hours from the time of filing,
unless doing so is impracticable. However, the court may grant a
continuance of:
(1) not more than five (5) days, if requested by the arrestee;
and
(2) not more than three (3) days, if requested by the state.
(d) At the bail hearing, the arrestee has all constitutional rights
guaranteed to a person accused of a crime, including the right to be
represented by counsel and, if the arrestee is indigent, to have
counsel appointed. The arrestee also has the right to testify, to
present evidence, and to subpoena and cross-examine witnesses.
(e) In making a determination of whether to deny bail, a court
shall consider the following factors, in addition to any other fact or
circumstance relevant to reasonably assuring appearance and the
safety of any other person or the community:
(1) The nature and circumstances of the offense charged,
including whether the offense is an offense of violence or
involves alcohol or drug abuse.
(2) The weight of the evidence against the arrestee.
(3) The history and characteristics of the arrestee, including:
(A) the character, physical and mental condition, family
ties, employment, financial resources, length of residence
in the community, community ties, past conduct, history
relating to drug or alcohol abuse, and criminal history of
the arrestee; and
(B) whether, at the time of the current alleged offense or at
the time of the arrest of the arrestee, the arrestee was on
probation, parole, community corrections, or release
pending trial, sentencing, appeal, or completion of sentence
for the commission of an offense under the laws of this
2026 IN 1194—LS 6807/DI 106


state, another state, or the United States.
(4) The nature and seriousness of the danger to any person or
the community that would be posed by the arrestee's release.
(5) The availability, suitability, and effectiveness of less
restrictive alternatives to detention and specific conditions of
release that could reasonably mitigate the identified risk.
(6) Any other fact or circumstance that is relevant to
reasonably assuring the appearance of the arrestee and the
safety of any other person or the community.
(f) If the court denies bail under this section, the court shall
issue brief written findings and conclusions setting forth reasons
for the denial.
(g) No evidence or finding from a hearing under this section is
admissible as substantive evidence at a trial concerning the offense
for which the hearing was conducted. The evidence or findings may
be admissible as impeachment or in a prosecution for perjury.
(h) If the court determines that an arrestee should not be denied
bail, the court shall set terms of pretrial release for the arrestee in
accordance with this chapter.
(i) An order granting or denying bail is a final appealable order.
The pendency of an appeal from the denial of bail does not stay
proceedings in the trial court.
(j) A court may reconsider an order granting or denying bail
under this section if, at any time before trial, the court is made
aware of information that was unknown or unobtainable at the
time of a previous hearing and that has a material bearing on the
issue of whether there are conditions of release that will reasonably
assure the safety of any other person or the community. The court
may order a new hearing under this section upon motion of the
state or the arrestee.
SECTION 3. IC 35-33-8-3.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.187-2017,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.8. (a) A court shall consider the results of
the Indiana pretrial risk assessment system (if available) before setting
or modifying bail for an arrestee.
(b) If the court finds, based on the results of the Indiana pretrial risk
assessment system (if available) and other relevant factors, that an
arrestee does not present a substantial risk of flight or danger to the
arrestee or others, the court shall consider releasing the arrestee
without money bail or surety, subject to restrictions and conditions as
determined by the court, unless one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The arrestee is charged with murder or treason.
2026 IN 1194—LS 6807/DI 106


(2) The arrestee is on pretrial release not related to the incident
that is the basis for the present arrest.
(3) The arrestee is on probation, parole, or other community
supervision.
(4) The arrestee is a violent arrestee as defined in section 3.4
of this chapter.
(5) The arrestee is a sexually violent predator defendant as
defined in section 3.5 of this chapter.
(6) The arrestee has been denied bail pursuant to section 3.7
of this chapter.
(7) The arrestee is a foreign national who is unlawfully
present in the United States as described in section 4.5 of this
chapter.
The court is not required to administer an assessment before releasing
an arrestee if administering the assessment will delay the arrestee's
release.
2026 IN 1194—LS 6807/DI 106